Tennessee, session 114, HB1226.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 7-51-209(a)(4)(C)(i), is amended by
deleting "the World Health Organization or".
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 68-2-611(a)(1), is amended by
deleting "world health organization" and substituting "federal centers for disease control and
prevention".
SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1226
002463
- 1 -